Utah statutes.
48-2c-212 (Repealed 07/01/13).   Evidentiary effect of copy of filed document.

A certificate attached to a copy of a document filed by the division, or an endorsement, seal, or stamp placed on the copy, which certificate, endorsement, seal, or stamp bears the signature of the director of the division, or a facsimile of the director's signature, and the seal of the division, is conclusive evidence that the original document has been filed with the division.



Enacted by Chapter 260, 2001 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

